Utah statutes.
79-3-401.   Disposition of survey income -- Sources of funds.
(1)  Income to the survey is deposited with the state treasurer and credited
by the treasurer to the General Fund as a nonlapsing restrictive account for
use by the survey.
(2)  In addition to those funds that are available to the survey under
Subsection (1), the Legislature shall provide such funds by appropriation as
are reasonably necessary to meet the requirements of the survey in the
performance of its duties and obligations.
